Maryland, session 2025, SB0841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–1006.3.
(A) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE TIDAL FISHERIES ADVISORY
COMMISSION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL IDENTIFY BY REGULATION THE PUBLIC
CLAM FISHERY AREA IN THE CHESAPEAKE BAY BASED ON COMMERCIAL
HARVESTING ACTIVITY DURING THE 3 YEARS PRECEDING JUNE 1, 2025, ANY
SURVEYS CONDUCTED BY THE DEPARTMENT, AND OTHER QUANTITATIVE DATA
KNOWN OR MADE AVAILABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PUBLIC CLAM FISHERY AREA MAY NOT BE LEASED FOR SHELLFISH
AQUACULTURE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0841*

SENATE BILL 841
(C) A TIDAL FISH LICENSE HOLDER MAY CATCH CLAMS IN AREAS LOCATED
OUTSIDE THE PUBLIC CLAM FISHERY AREA UNLESS PROHIBITED BY LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.